src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON LONDON-OBL_PLC-ORG
 +Sg+Gen+Allegro+Use/NG:    K ;
                +Sg+Gen:a   K ;
                +Sg+Acc:a   K ;
                +Sg+Ill:ij  K ;
                +Sg+Loc:is  K ;
  +Sg+Loc+South+Use/Sub:in  K ; !SOUTH
                +Sg+Com:ijn K ;
                   +Ess:in  K ;
!+Pl+Nom:at K ;
!+Pl+Gen:ijd K ;
!+Pl+Acc:ijd K ;
!+Pl+Ill:ijdda K ;
!+Pl+Loc:ijn K ;
!+Pl+Com:ijgujn K ;


LEXICON DUBAI-plc
!Like BERN for names ending Vowel-i
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ DUBAI-UCASE_PLC-ORG ;
                           :%>a           PLACELASH           ;

LEXICON DUBAI-fem
!Like BERN for names ending Vowel-i
      @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ DUBAI-UCASE ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Attr:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ #           ;

LEXICON DUBAI-mal
!Like BERN for names ending Vowel-i
      @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%>@U.Cap.Obl@  DUBAI-UCASE ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Attr:%>@U.Cap.Obl@i #           ;

LEXICON DUBAI-sur
!Like BERN for names ending Vowel-i
                         +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ DUBAI-UCASE ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ #           ; !

LEXICON DUBAI-obj
!Like BERN for names ending Vowel-i
 +N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ DUBAI-UCASE ;


LEXICON DUBAI-org
!Like BERN for names ending Vowel-i
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ DUBAI-UCASE_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON DUBAI-UCASE
               +Sg+Nom:i        K                  ;
             +CmpN/SgN:i        RHyph              ;
       +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%:is     K                  ; ! Ty^dal:s
        +Sg+Gen+Use/NG:i        K                  ;
               +Sg+Gen:ija      K                  ;
             +CmpN/SgG:ija      RHyph              ;
               +Sg+Acc:ija      K                  ;
        +Sg+Acc+Use/NG:i        K                  ;
               +Sg+Ill:ijij     K                  ;
               +Sg+Loc:ijas     K                  ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Use/Sub:ijan     K                  ; !SOUTH
               +Sg+Com:ijain    K                  ;
                  +Ess:ijan     K                  ;
               +Pl+Nom:ijat     K                  ;
               +Pl+Gen:ijajd9   K                  ;
               +Pl+Acc:ijajd9   K                  ;
               +Pl+Ill:ijajde   K                  ;
               +Pl+Loc:ijain    K                  ;
               +Pl+Com:ijaigujn K                  ;
              +Use/Sub:%:i      BERN-OBL           ; !
              +Use/Sub:%i-      BERN-OBL           ; !
              +Use/Sub:%:i      LONDON-SUBSTANDARD ; !
              +Use/Sub:%i-      LONDON-SUBSTANDARD ; !

LEXICON DUBAI-UCASE_PLC-ORG
         +Sg+Nom:i    K                  ;
       +CmpN/SgN:i    RHyph              ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%:is K                  ; ! Ty^dal:s
  +Sg+Acc+Use/NG:i    K                  ;
  +Sg+Gen+Use/NG:i    K                  ;
                :ij   DUBAI-OBL_PLC-ORG  ;
        +Use/Sub:%:i  BERN-OBL_PLC-ORG   ; !
        +Use/Sub:%i-  BERN-OBL_PLC-ORG   ; !
        +Use/Sub:%:i  LONDON-SUBSTANDARD ; !
        +Use/Sub:%i-  LONDON-SUBSTANDARD ; !

LEXICON DUBAI-OBL_PLC-ORG
               +Sg+Gen:a   K     ;
             +CmpN/SgG:a   RHyph ;
               +Sg+Acc:a   K     ;
               +Sg+Ill:ij  K     ;
               +Sg+Loc:as  K     ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Use/Sub:an  K     ; !SOUTH
               +Sg+Com:ain K     ;
                  +Ess:an  K     ;
!+Pl+Nom:at K ;
!+Pl+Gen:ajd9 K ;
!+Pl+Acc:ajd9 K ;
!+Pl+Ill:ajde K ;
!+Pl+Loc:ain K ;
!+Pl+Com:aigujn K ;



LEXICON BERN-ani
!Different lexicon for animals. Eurokas.
 +N+Prop+Sem/Ani:%> BERNDECL ;

LEXICON BERN-mal
! Different lexicon for male persons. Finn. Torfinn.
                 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%>            BERNDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Attr:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ #        ; !

LEXICON BERN-surmal
! Different lexicon for male persons & personal surnames.
                 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%>            BERNDECL ;
                 +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>            BERNDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Attr:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ #        ; !

LEXICON BERN-fem
! Different lexicon for female persons. Aud^hild.
                 +N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%>            BERNDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Attr:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ #        ; !

LEXICON BERN-femplc
! Different lexicon for female persons and place names.
                 +N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%>            BERNDECL         ;
                 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>            BERNDECL_PLC-ORG ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Attr:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ #                ; !

LEXICON BERN-sur
! Different lexicon for personal surnames. Blind
                         +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>            BERNDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ #        ; !

LEXICON BERN-LOAN-plc
! Different lexicon for place names. Bern.
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>  BERNDECL-LOAN ;
        +Use/Sub:%>a PLACELASH     ; !

LEXICON BERN-plc
! Different lexicon for place names. Bern.
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>  BERNDECL_PLC-ORG ;
                :%>a PLACELASH        ;

LEXICON BERN-org
! Different lexicon for organisations. Microsoft.
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> BERNDECL_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON BERN-LOAN-org
! Different lexicon for organisations. Microsoft.
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> BERNDECL-LOAN ;

LEXICON BERN-orgsur
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> BERNDECL_PLC-ORG ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> BERNDECL         ;

LEXICON BERN-obj
! Different lexicon for objects, concrete and abstract. Word.
 +N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> BERNDECL ;

LEXICON BERN-LOAN-obj
! Different lexicon for objects, concrete and abstract. Word.
 +N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> BERNDECL-LOAN ;


LEXICON BERN-objsur
! Different lexicon for names that are both objects and surnames.
                         +N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%>            BERNDECL ;
                         +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>            BERNDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ #        ; !

LEXICON BERN
 +N+Prop:%> BERNDECL ;

LEXICON BERNDECL ! Final foot structure (X) => Loc:as
   BERN-UCASE ;

LEXICON BERNDECL_PLC-ORG ! Final foot structure (X) => Loc:as
   BERN-UCASE_PLC-ORG ;


LEXICON BERNDECL-LOAN ! Final foot structure (X) => Loc:as
   BERN-UCASE-LOAN ;

LEXICON BERN-UCASE
              +Sg+Nom:    K                  ;
            +CmpN/SgN:    RHyph              ;
 +CmpN/SgN+Use/-Spell:    RProp              ;
      +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%:s K                  ; ! Ty^dal:s
                          BERN-OBL           ;
             +Use/Sub:%:  BERN-OBL           ; !
             +Use/Sub:%-  BERN-OBL           ; !
             +Use/Sub:%:  LONDON-SUBSTANDARD ; !
             +Use/Sub:%-  LONDON-SUBSTANDARD ; !

LEXICON BERN-UCASE_PLC-ORG
              +Sg+Nom:    K                  ;
            +CmpN/SgN:    RHyph              ;
 +CmpN/SgN+Use/-Spell:    RProp              ;
      +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%:s K                  ; ! Ty^dal:s
                          BERN-OBL_PLC-ORG   ;
             +Use/Sub:%:  BERN-OBL_PLC-ORG   ; !
             +Use/Sub:%-  BERN-OBL_PLC-ORG   ; !
             +Use/Sub:%:  LONDON-SUBSTANDARD ; !
             +Use/Sub:%-  LONDON-SUBSTANDARD ; !
