src/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON Prefix-Proper
Davvi-Fron:Davvi-Fron9 BERN-plc ;
Lulle-Wales BERN-plc ;
LEXICON ProperNoun
Ambarčik BERN-plc ;
Andreevič:Andre^evič BERN-sur ;
Bajábeal:Bajá^beal BERN-LOAN-obj ;
Bajálbeal+Use/Sub:Bajál^beal BERN-obj ; !
Arctic% Cat BERN-obj ;
Arpakšad:Arpakšad9 BERN-plc ;
Aserbaižan:Aserbaižan9 BERN-plc ;
Ašdod:Ašdod9 BERN-plc ;
Aškenas BERN-org ;
Ašterot BERN-mal ;
Beijin:Beijin9 BERN-plc ;
Beijing:Beijing9 BERN-plc ;
Benestad:Bene^stad9 BERN-sur ;
Biennaš-Jon:Biennaš-Jon9 BERN-mal ;
Blagoveščensk:Blagoveščensk9 BERN-plc ;
Dieđut+Use/Sub:Diedut BERN-obj ; !
Dugstad:Dug^stad9 BERN-sur ;
Dálvadis BERN-plc ; !Check this!
Sámi% Boy+CmpN/None:Sámi% Boy BERN-obj ; !
Sámi% Grand% Prix BERN-obj ;
Sámi% boy+Use/LexSub:Sámi% boy BERN-obj ; !
Deanu% Leagi% cup:Deanu% Leagi% cup9 BERN-obj ;
MM-cup:MM-cup9 BERN-obj ;
NM-cup:NM-cup9 BERN-obj ;
SHL-cup:SHL-cup9 BERN-obj ;
SM-cup:SM-cup9 BERN-obj ;
SVL-cup:SVL-cup9 BERN-obj ;
UNN-cup:UNN-cup9 BERN-obj ;
Sámi-Cup:Sámi-Cup9 BERN-obj ;
Suoma% cup:Suoma% cup9 BERN-obj ;
Nilut% cup:Nilut% cup9 BERN-obj ;
Verddecup:Verdde^cup9 BERN-obj ;
Eurohpácup:Eurohpá^cup9 BERN-obj ;
Europacup:Europa^cup9 BERN-obj ;
FMX-máilmmicup:FMX-máilmmi^cup9 BERN-obj ;
Firefox:Firefox BERN-org ;
Fløgstad:Fløg^stad9 BERN-sur ;
Gasteiz:Gasteiz9 BERN-plc ;
NM-scootercross+Use/Sub:NM-scooter#cross9 BERN-obj; !^LOAN
NM-skuhtercross:NM-skuhter#cross9 BERN-obj; !^LOAN
NM-skohtercross:NM-skohter#cross9 BERN-obj; !^LOAN
NM-skutercross:NM-skuter#cross9 BERN-obj; !^LOAN
Gorholt BERN-sur ;
Girkonjárga-Nordlys:Girkonjárga-Nord^lys BERN-obj ;
Fállejohka-Nordlys:Fálle^johka-Nord^lys BERN-obj ;
Hammerfest+Use/Sub:Hámmer^fest9 BERN-plc ; !
Haugaard:Haugaard9 BERN-sur ;
High:High9 BERN-obj ;
Kuottemjaur+Use/LexSub:Kuottem^jaur BERN-plc ; !
Leijaur+Use/LexSub:Lei^jaur BERN-plc ; !
Luostejok+Use/LexSub:Luoste^jok BERN-plc ; !
Lábbájot+Use/LexSub:Lábbájot BERN ; !
Nuettjaur+Use/LexSub:Nuett^jaur BERN-plc ; !
Jeuš:Je^uš BERN-sur ;
Jišbak:Jiš^bak BERN-sur ;
Josát:Josáb BERN-mal ;
Jošafat BERN-mal ;
Kašmir BERN-plc ;
KingQuad:King^Quad9 BERN-obj ;
Kišinjov BERN-sur ;
Komšilov BERN-sur ;
Kuibyšev BERN-sur ;
Kuš BERN-sur ;
Lahnstein:Lahn^stein BERN-sur ;
Lisl BERN-fem ;
Maš BERN-sur ;
Metušalah:Metušalah9 BERN-plc ;
Midlands:Mid^lands BERN-plc ;
Norske% Kveners% Forbund:Norske% Kveners% Forbund9 BERN-org ;
Pošman:Pošman9 BERN-sur ;
Press:Press9 BERN-sur ;
Reiseliv BERN-obj ;
Roš BERN-sur ;
Rugtved:Rug^tved9 BERN-plc ;
SURT BERN-org ;
Scandinavia% Golf% Business:Scandinavia% Golf% Business9 BERN-org ;
Seidajok:Seida^jok9 BERN-plc ;
Ska% Patrol BERN-org ;
Sluč BERN-sur ;
Suđuroy:Suđur^oy BERN-plc ;
Tažikistan:Tažiki^stan9 BERN-plc ;
Taškent BERN-sur ;
Tkačev BERN-sur ;
Vasiljevič BERN-sur ;
Davvikalohtta-cocktail:Davvi^kalohtta-cocktail BERN-obj ;
Vjačeslav BERN-sur ;
Ápparan:Ápparam BERN-plc ;
Siiddaid% Cup:Siiddaid% Cup9 BERN-obj ;
Čad:Čad9 BERN-plc ;
Čeljabinsk BERN-plc ;
Čeljuskin:Čeljuskin9 BERN-sur ;
Šem:Šem9 BERN-sur ;
Šemeber BERN-sur ;
Černjahovsk BERN-plc ;
Šiauliai:Ši^auli^a DUBAI-sur ;
Čohk BERN-sur ;
Šuah:Šu^ah9 BERN-sur ;
Čum:Čum9 BERN-org ;
Šur BERN-mal ;
